District of Columbia statutes.
7-741.07

Rulemaking.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter. Any proposed regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be submitted to the Council for a 60-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 60-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4921
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-90, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1087

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-741.05.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 7-747.